tables/de-g2-core.cti
word       aber       1                            #  A  #
nocross always    aber       2-1                          #  ,A  #
nocross midendword    ach        56a                           #  <  #
nocross begmidword    al         25a                           #  :  #
nocross always    al'        25a-6                         #  :'  #
prfword    all        1-12345                      #  AQ  #
nocross always    all        1                            #  A  #
word       als        146a                          #  3  #
nocross always    also       1-135                        #  AO  #
endword    an         1-1345                       #  AN  #
nocross always    an         235a                          #  +  #
nocross always    an'        235a-6                        #  +'  #
nocross always    ander      2-12456a                      #  ,7  #
nocross begmidword    ar         356a                          #  )  #
nocross always    ar'        356a-6                        #  )'  #
nocross always    arbeit     356a-12                       #  )B  #
nocross always    ation      5-1345                       #  !N  #
nocross always    ativ       5-1236                       #  !V  #
word       au         6-16a                         #  '1  #
nocross always    au         16a                           #  1  #
word       auch       34a                           #  \  #
word       auf        16a                           #  1  #
nocross always    auf        2-16a                         #  ,1  #
nocross begmidword    be         23a                           #  ;  #
nocross always    be'        23a-6                         #  ;'  #
word       bei        12                           #  B  #
nocross always    bei        2-12                         #  ,B  #
nocross always    beid       12-145                       #  BD  #
word       beim       12-134                       #  BM  #
nocross always    besonder   23a                           #  ;  #
nocross always    besser     234-234                      #  SS  #
nocross always    bis        12-234                       #  BS  #
nocross always    bist       12-23456a                     #  B]  #
nocross always    bleib      12-12                        #  BB  #
nocross always    brauch     2-34a                         #  ,\  #
nocross always    brief      12-124                       #  BF  #
nocross always    bring      12-1245                      #  BG  #
nocross always    bräuch     5-34a                         #  !\  #
always     c          6-14                         #  'C  #
always     C          6-14                         #  'C  #
word       ch         6-1456a                       #  '4  #
nocross always    ch         1456a                         #  4  #
nocross always    charakter  1456a-13                      #  4K  #
nocross midendword    ck         46a                           #  $  #
nocross always    dabei      145-12                       #  DB  #
word       dadurch    145-145                      #  DD  #
nocross always    dafür      145-124                      #  DF  #
nocross always    dagegen    145-1245                     #  DG  #
nocross always    daher      145-125                      #  DH  #
nocross always    damit      145-134                      #  DM  #
nocross always    dank       145-13                       #  DK  #
nocross always    darauf     145-16a                       #  D1  #
nocross always    darüber    145-1256a                     #  D8  #
word       das        145                          #  D  #
word       dass       2346a                         #  ^  #
nocross always    davon      145-1236                     #  DV  #
nocross always    dazu       145-1356                     #  DZ  #
word       dem        12356a                        #  [  #
nocross always    dem        2-12356a                      #  ,[  #
nocross always    demokrat   145-2345                     #  DT  #
word       den        15                           #  E  #
word       denen      15-14                        #  EC  #
nocross always    denn       145-1345                     #  DN  #
word       der        1235                         #  R  #
word       des        3a                            #  .  #
nocross always    dessen     145-2346a                     #  D^  #
nocross always    deutsch    145-156a                      #  D5  #
word       die        346a                          #  0  #
nocross begmidword    dies       346a                          #  0  #
word       dir        145-1235                     #  DR  #
word       doch       145-1456a                     #  D4  #
nocross always    druck      145-46a                       #  D$  #
nocross always    drück      5-145-46a                     #  !D$  #
word       durch      1456a                         #  4  #
nocross always    durch      2-1456a                       #  ,4  #
nocross always    dürf       2-145                        #  ,D  #
nocross always    ebenso     15-135                       #  EO  #
nocross midword    eh         2356a                         #  =  #
word       ei         6-146a                        #  '3  #
nocross always    ei         146a                          #  3  #
nocross always    ein        1246a                         #  6  #
nocross always    einander   2-1246a                       #  ,6  #
nocross always    el         13456                        #  Y  #
nocross always    em         12356a                        #  [  #
nocross always    en         14                           #  C  #
nocross begword   ent        2346a                         #  ^  #
word       eo         6-15-135                     #  'EO  #
nocross always    er         12456a                        #  7  #
nocross always    es         123456a                       #  %  #
nocross always    etwa       15-1                         #  EA  #
nocross always    etwas      2345-2456                    #  TW  #
word       eu         6-126a                        #  '2  #
nocross always    eu         126a                          #  2  #
begword    ex         1346                         #  X  #
nocross always    'ex        6-15-6-1346                  #  'E'X  #
nocross always    fall       124-12345                    #  FQ  #
nocross always    fahr       2-1235                       #  ,R  #
word       falls      124-12345-234                #  FQS  #
nocross midendword    falls      124                          #  F  #
nocross always    fertig     124-45a                       #  F>  #
nocross always    folg       124-1245                     #  FG  #
nocross always    freund     124-145                      #  FD  #
nocross always    fäll       5-124-12345                  #  !FQ  #
nocross always    fähr       5-1235                       #  !R  #
nocross always    führ       124-125                      #  FH  #
word       für        124                          #  F  #
nocross always    für        2-124                        #  ,F  #
nocross always    ganz       1245-1356                    #  GZ  #
nocross always    ge         12346a                        #  &  #
word       gegen      1245                         #  G  #
nocross always    gegen      2-1245                       #  ,G  #
nocross always    gegenwart  1245-2456                    #  GW  #
nocross always    gegenwärt  5-1245-2456                  #  !GW  #
nocross always    gegenüber  1245-1256a                    #  G8  #
nocross always    gelegen       1245-1245                    #  GG  #
nocross always    geschäft     1245-124                     #  GF  #
nocross always    gesellschaft  1245-156a                  #  G5  #
word       gewesen    12346a                        #  &  #
nocross always    gewesen    2-12346a                      #  ,&  #
nocross always    geworden   12346a-2456                   #  &W  #
nocross always    gibt       1245-12                      #  GB  #
nocross always    gleich     1245-1456a                    #  G4  #
nocross always    glück      1245-46a                      #  G$  #
nocross always    gross      1245-2346a                    #  G^  #
nocross always    groß       1245-2346a                    #  G^  #
nocross always    grund      1245-145                     #  GD  #
nocross always    gröss      5-1245-2346a                  #  !G^  #
nocross always    größ       5-1245-2346a                  #  !G^  #
nocross always    gründ      5-1245-145                   #  !GD  #
nocross always    gänz       5-1245-1356                  #  !GZ  #
nocross always    hab        2-125                        #  ,H  #
nocross always    haft       125-124                      #  HF  #
nocross always    hand       125-145                      #  HD  #
nocross always    hast       125-23456a                    #  H]  #
nocross always    hat        125-2345                     #  HT  #
nocross always    hatt       125                          #  H  #
nocross always    haupt      125-1234                     #  HP  #
word       he         6-125-15                     #  'HE  #
word       het        6-125-15-2345                #  'HET  #
nocross midendword heit      125                          #  H  #
nocross always    herr       1235-1235                    #  RR  #
nocross always    hier       125-1235                     #  HR  #
nocross always    hoff       124-124                      #  FF  #
nocross always    häft       5-125-124                    #  !HF  #
nocross always    händ       5-125-145                    #  !HD  #
nocross always    hätt       345a                          #  @  #
nocross always    häupt      5-125-1234                   #  !HP  #
nocross always    ich        3456a                         #  #  #
word       ich,       24-1456a-2                    #  I4,  #
word       ich;       24-1456a-23                   #  I4;  #
word       ich:       24-1456a-25                   #  I4:  #
word       ich?       24-1456a-26                   #  I4?  #
word       ich!       24-1456a-235                  #  I4+  #
word       ich)       24-1456a-2356                 #  I4=  #
word       ich"       24-1456a-356                  #  I4)  #
word       ich«       24-1456a-356                  #  I4)  #
word       ich»       24-1456a-356                  #  I4)  #
word       ich┊       24-1456a-abcdef               #  I4x  #
nocross midendword    ie         346a                          #  0  #
nocross midendword    ig         45a                           #  >  #
word       ihm        236a                          #  (  #
nocross always    ihn        24-125                       #  IH  #
nocross sufword   ihr        24                           #  I  #
word       im         36b                          #  -  #
word       immer      1346                         #  X  #
nocross always    immer      2-1346                       #  ,X  #
nocross always    in         35a                           #  *  #
nocross always    interess   2-35a                         #  ,*  #
nocross always    irgend     24-1245                      #  IG  #
nocross always    ismus      5-24                         #  !I  #
word       ist        23456a                        #  ]  #
nocross always    istisch    5-156a                        #  !5  #
nocross always    ität       5-345a                        #  !@  #
nocross always    jahr       245-1235                     #  JR  #
nocross always    jahrhundert 245-125                     #  JH  #
nocross always    jahrtausend 245-2345                    #  JT  #
nocross always    jahrzehnt  245-1356                     #  JZ  #
nocross always    jed        245-145                      #  JD  #
word       jedoch     245-1456a                     #  J4  #
nocross always    jetzig     245-45a                       #  J>  #
word       jetzt      245                          #  J  #
nocross always    jetzt      2-245                        #  ,J  #
